Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska13-922
Suit against employee; recovery; limitation.

The total amount recoverable against any employee for claims filed pursuant to section 13-920 or 13-921 arising out of an occurrence after May 13, 1987, shall be limited to: (1) One million dollars for any person for any number of claims arising out of a single occurrence; and (2) five million dollars for all claims arising out of a single occurrence.

Laws 1987, LB 258, § 3;

R.S.Supp.,1987, § 23-2416.03.